Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2019.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 85.59a of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. There is hereby created the Political Subdivision Liability
Insurance Guaranty Program for the purpose of insuring against
excessive liability judgments against political subdivisions.
B. The program shall be administered, supervised, and protected
by the Political Subdivision Insurance Fund Board. The Board shall
consist of seven (7) members to be appointed as follows:
1. The Governor shall appoint three members, one of whom shall
be a member of a governing body of a political subdivision;
2. The President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall appoint two
members, one of whom shall be a member of a governing body of a
political subdivision; and
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2019 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

3. The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint
two members, one of whom shall be a member of a governing body of a
political subdivision.
C. In the event of a vacancy, the appointing authority for the
position shall appoint a qualified successor to serve as the
appointee for the unexpired term of the member so replaced. The
term of office for the appointees shall be as follows:
1. The term of office for four positions, two appointed by the
Governor, and one each appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the
Senate and Speaker of the House of Representatives, shall expire on
November 1, 2029;
2. The term of office for three positions, one each appointed
by the Governor, President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and Speaker of
the House of Representatives, shall expire on November 1, 2028; and
3. Thereafter, successor members shall be appointed for a
three-year term. Members may serve successive terms. Any person
appointed to fill a vacancy shall be appointed for the unexpired
portion of the term in the same manner as the original appointment.
D. Meetings of the Board shall be held at least quarterly, with
the first meeting to be held no later than March 31, 2027. The
chair and vice chair of the Board shall be elected by the Board from
among its members in the first meeting. The presence of a majority
of the members constitutes a quorum. No action shall be taken by

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2019 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

the Board without the affirmative vote of at least a majority of the
members.
E. The Board shall be required to create the rules and
guidelines for the voluntary Political Subdivision Liability
Insurance Guaranty Program, including required contributions,
qualifying claims, and procedures, as well as any other requirements
to effectuate the provisions of this act.
F. The Board shall create required training programs for
certain members of political subdivisions to mitigate the occurrence
of judgments for which the program is created to insure against.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 85.59b of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. There is hereby created the Political Subdivision Liability
Insurance Guaranty Fund, which shall be for the purpose of insuring
participating political subdivisions against excessive liability
judgments as provided by the Political Subdivision Insurance Fund
Board. Monies in the fund, including interest, are not subject to
appropriation and shall be expended to insure political subdivisions
pursuant to the Political Subdivision Liability Insurance Guaranty
Program, operating costs of the Board, attorney fees, and other
costs reasonably incurred by the Board in the performance of its
duties.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2019 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

B. Expenditures from the fund shall be made on warrants issued
by the State Treasurer against claims as prescribed by law. The
fund shall be subject to audit in the same manner as state funds and
accounts, the cost for which shall be paid for from the fund.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON LOCAL AND COUNTY GOVERNMENT
February 17, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED


















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2019 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)